Utah statutes.
57-2-14.   Proof of handwriting.

No proof by evidence of the handwriting of a party, or of the subscribing witness or witnesses, shall be taken unless the officer taking the same shall be satisfied that all the subscribing witnesses to such conveyance are dead, out of the jurisdiction, or cannot be had to prove the execution thereof.

